Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 8. Rules of Construction Applicable to Wills and Other Governing Instruments.

Sec. 13.12.701.
Scope.

In the absence of a finding of a contrary intention, the rules of construction in AS

13.12.701

—

13.12.711

control the construction of a governing instrument. The rules of construction in AS

13.12.701

—

13.12.711

apply to a governing instrument of any type, except as the application of a particular section is limited by its terms to a specific type of provision or governing instrument.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.702.
Requirement of survival by 120 hours.

For the purposes of AS 13.06 — AS 13.36, except as provided in (d) of this section, an individual who is not established by clear and convincing evidence to have survived an event, including the death of another individual, by 120 hours is considered to have predeceased the event.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, for purposes of a provision of a governing instrument that relates to an individual surviving an event, including the death of another individual, an individual who is not established by clear and convincing evidence to have survived the event by 120 hours is considered to have predeceased the event.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, if it is not established by clear and convincing evidence that one of two co-owners with right of survivorship survived the other co-owner by 120 hours, one-half of the property passes as if one had survived by 120 hours and one-half as if the other had survived by 120 hours, and if there are more than two co-owners with right of survivorship and it is not established by clear and convincing evidence that at least one of them survived the others by 120 hours, the property passes in the proportion that one bears to the whole number of co-owners. In this subsection, “co-owners with right of survivorship” includes joint tenants, tenants by the entirety, and other co-owners of property or accounts held under circumstances that entitle one or more to the whole of the property or account on the death of the other or others.

Survival by 120 hours is not required if

the governing instrument contains language dealing explicitly with simultaneous deaths or deaths in a common disaster and that language is operable under the facts of the case;

the governing instrument expressly indicates that an individual is not required to survive an event, including the death of another individual, by a specified period or expressly requires the individual to survive the event by a specified period, but survival of the event or the specified period must be established by clear and convincing evidence;

the imposition of a 120-hour requirement of survival would cause a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment to fail to qualify for validity under AS

34.27.051

or

34.27.100

or to become invalid under AS

34.27.051

or

34.27.100

, but survival must be established by clear and convincing evidence; or

the application of a 120-hour requirement of survival to multiple governing instruments would result in an unintended failure or duplication of a disposition, but survival must be established by clear and convincing evidence.

A payor or other third party is not liable for having made a payment or transferred an item of property or other benefit to a beneficiary designated in a governing instrument who, under this section, is not entitled to the payment or item of property, or for having taken other action in good faith reliance on the beneficiary’s apparent entitlement under the terms of the governing instrument, before the payor or other third party receives written notice of a claimed lack of entitlement under this section. A payor or other third party is liable for a payment made or other action taken after the payor or other third party receives written notice of a claimed lack of entitlement under this section.

Written notice of a claimed lack of entitlement under this section shall be mailed to the payor’s or other third party’s main office or home by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, or served upon the payor or other third party in the same manner as a summons in a civil action. Upon receipt of written notice of a claimed lack of entitlement under this section, a payor or other third party may pay any amount owed or transfer or deposit an item of property held by it to or with the court having jurisdiction of the probate proceedings relating to the decedent’s estate, or if proceedings have not been commenced, to or with the court in the judicial district of the decedent’s residence. The court shall hold the funds or item of property and, upon the court’s determination under this section, shall order disbursement in accordance with the determination. Payments, transfers, or deposits made to or with the court discharge the payor or other third party from all claims for the value of amounts paid to or items of property transferred to or deposited with the court.

A person who purchases property for value and without notice, or who receives a payment or other item of property in partial or full satisfaction of a legally enforceable obligation, is not obligated under this section to return the payment, item of property, or benefit or liable under this section for the amount of the payment or the value of the item of property or benefit. But a person who, not for value, receives a payment, item of property, or other benefit to which the person is not entitled under this section is obligated to return the payment, item of property, or benefit, or is personally liable for the amount of the payment or the value of the item of property or benefit, to the person who is entitled to it under this section.

If this section or a part of this section is preempted by federal law with respect to a payment, an item of property, or other benefit covered by this section, a person who, not for value, receives the payment, item of property, or benefit to which the person is not entitled under this section is obligated to return the payment, item of property, or benefit, or is personally liable for the amount of the payment or the value of the item of property or benefit, to the person who would have been entitled to it if this section or part of this section were not preempted.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 17 SLA 2000)

Sec. 13.12.703.
Choice of law as to meaning and effect of governing instrument.

The meaning and legal effect of a governing instrument is determined by the local law of the state selected in the governing instrument, unless the application of that law is contrary to the provisions relating to the elective share described in AS

13.12.201

—

13.12.214

, the provisions relating to exempt property and allowances described in AS

13.12.401

—

13.12.405

, or other public policy of this state otherwise applicable to the disposition.

The provisions of (a) of this section are subject to AS

13.06.068

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.12.704.
Power of appointment; meaning of specific reference requirement.

If a governing instrument creating a power of appointment expressly requires that the power be exercised by a reference, an express reference, or a specific reference, to the power or its source, it is presumed that the donor’s intention, in requiring that the donee exercise the power by making reference to the particular power or to the creating instrument, was to prevent an inadvertent exercise of the power.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.705.
Class gifts; terms of relationship.

Adopted individuals and individuals born out of wedlock, and their respective descendants if appropriate to the class, are included in class gifts and other terms of relationship in accordance with the rules for intestate succession. Terms of relationship that do not differentiate relationships by blood from those by affinity, such as “uncles,” “aunts,” “nieces,” or “nephews,” are construed to exclude relatives by affinity. Terms of relationship that do not differentiate relationships by the half blood from those by the whole blood, such as “brothers,” “sisters,” “nieces,” or “nephews,” are construed to include both types of relationships.

In addition to the requirements of (a) of this section, in construing a dispositive provision of a transferor who is not the natural parent, an individual born to the natural parent is not considered the child of that natural parent unless the individual lived while a minor as a regular member of the household of that natural parent or of that natural parent’s parent, brother, sister, spouse, or surviving spouse.

In addition to the requirements of (a) of this section, in construing a dispositive provision of a transferor who is not the adopting parent, an adopted individual is not considered the child of the adopting parent unless the adopted individual lived while a minor, either before or after the adoption, as a regular member of the household of the adopting parent.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Collateral references. —

Adopted child as within class named in testamentary gift. 36 ALR5th 395.

Sec. 13.12.706.
Life insurance; retirement plan; account with pay on death designation; transfer on death registration; deceased beneficiary.

If a beneficiary fails to survive the decedent and is a grandparent, a descendant of a grandparent, or a stepchild of the decedent, the following apply:

except as provided in (4) of this subsection, if the beneficiary designation is not in the form of a class gift and the deceased beneficiary leaves surviving descendants, a substitute gift is created in the beneficiary’s surviving descendants; the beneficiary’s surviving descendants take by representation the property to which the beneficiary would have been entitled had the beneficiary survived the decedent;

except as provided in (4) of this subsection, if the beneficiary designation is in the form of a class gift, other than a beneficiary designation to “issue,” “descendants,” “heirs of the body,” “heirs,” “next of kin,” “relatives,” or “family,” or a class described by language of similar import, a substitute gift is created in the surviving descendants of a deceased beneficiary; the property to which the beneficiaries would have been entitled had all of them survived the decedent passes to the surviving beneficiaries and the surviving descendants of the deceased beneficiaries; each surviving beneficiary takes the share to which the surviving beneficiary would have been entitled had the deceased beneficiaries survived the decedent; each deceased beneficiary’s surviving descendants who are substituted for the deceased beneficiary take by representation the share to which the deceased beneficiary would have been entitled had the deceased beneficiary survived the decedent; in this paragraph, “deceased beneficiary” means a class member who failed to survive the decedent and left one or more surviving descendants;

for the purposes of AS

13.12.701

, words of survivorship, as in a beneficiary designation to an individual “if the individual survives me,” or in a beneficiary designation to “my surviving children,” are not, in the absence of additional evidence, a sufficient indication of an intent contrary to the application of this section;

if a governing instrument creates an alternative beneficiary designation with respect to a beneficiary designation for which a substitute gift is created by (1) or (2) of this subsection, the substitute gift is superseded by the alternative beneficiary designation only if an expressly designated beneficiary of the alternative beneficiary designation is entitled to take.

If, under (a) of this section, substitute gifts are created and not superseded with respect to more than one beneficiary designation and the beneficiary designations are alternative beneficiary designations, one to the other, the property passes under the primary substitute gift, except that if there is a younger-generation beneficiary designation, the property passes under the younger-generation substitute gift and not under the primary substitute gift. In this subsection,

“primary beneficiary designation” means the beneficiary designation that would have taken effect had all the deceased beneficiaries of the alternative beneficiary designations who left surviving descendants survived the decedent;

“primary substitute gift” means the substitute gift created with respect to the primary beneficiary designation;

“younger-generation beneficiary designation” means a beneficiary designation that

is to a descendant of a beneficiary of the primary beneficiary designation;

is an alternative beneficiary designation with respect to the primary beneficiary designation;

is a beneficiary designation for which a substitute gift is created; and

would have taken effect had all the deceased beneficiaries who left surviving descendants survived the decedent except the deceased beneficiary or beneficiaries of the primary beneficiary designation;

“younger-generation substitute gift” means the substitute gift created with respect to the younger-generation beneficiary designation.

A payor is protected from liability in making payments under the terms of the beneficiary designation until the payor has received written notice of a claim to a substitute gift under this section. Payment made before the receipt of written notice of a claim to a substitute gift under this section discharges the payor, but not the recipient, from all claims for the amounts paid. A payor is liable for a payment made after the payor has received written notice of the claim. A recipient is liable for a payment received, whether or not written notice of the claim is given.

In (c) of this section, the written notice of the claim shall be mailed to the payor’s main office or home by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, or served upon the payor in the same manner as a summons in a civil action. Upon receipt of written notice of the claim, a payor may pay any amount owed by it to the court having jurisdiction of the probate proceedings relating to the decedent’s estate or, if proceedings have not been commenced, to the court in the judicial district of the decedent’s residence. The court shall hold the funds and, upon its determination under this section, shall order disbursement in accordance with the determination. Payment made to the court discharges the payor from all claims for the amounts paid.

A person who purchases property for value and without notice, or who receives a payment or other item of property in partial or full satisfaction of a legally enforceable obligation, is not obligated under this section to return the payment, item of property, or benefit, or liable under this section for the amount of the payment or the value of the item of property or benefit. But a person who, not for value, receives a payment, item of property, or other benefit to which the person is not entitled under this section is obligated to return the payment, item of property, or benefit, or is personally liable for the amount of the payment or the value of the item of property or benefit, to the person who is entitled to it under this section.

If this section or a part of this section is preempted by federal law with respect to a payment, an item of property, or other benefit covered by this section, a person who, not for value, receives the payment, item of property, or other benefit to which the person is not entitled under this section is obligated to return the payment, item of property, or benefit, or is personally liable for the amount of the payment or the value of the item of property or benefit, to the person who would have been entitled to it if this section or part of this section were not preempted.

In this section,

“alternative beneficiary designation” means a beneficiary designation that is expressly created by the governing instrument and, under the terms of the governing instrument, can take effect instead of another beneficiary designation on the happening of one or more events, including survival of the decedent or failure to survive the decedent, whether an event is expressed in condition-precedent, condition-subsequent, or another form;

“beneficiary” means the beneficiary of a beneficiary designation under which the beneficiary must survive the decedent and

includes a class member if the beneficiary designation is in the form of a class gift;

includes an individual or class member who was deceased at the time the beneficiary designation was executed as well as an individual or class member who was then living but who failed to survive the decedent;

excludes a joint tenant of a joint tenancy with the right of survivorship and a party to a joint and survivorship account;

“beneficiary designation” includes an alternative beneficiary designation and a beneficiary designation in the form of a class gift;

“class member” includes an individual who fails to survive the decedent but who would have taken under a beneficiary designation in the form of a class gift had the individual survived the decedent;

“stepchild” means a child of the decedent’s surviving, deceased, or former spouse, and not of the decedent;

“surviving beneficiary” or “surviving descendant” means a beneficiary or a descendant who neither predeceased the decedent nor is considered to have predeceased the decedent under AS

13.12.702

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.707.
Survivorship with respect to future interests under terms of trust; substitute takers.

A future interest under the terms of a trust is contingent on the beneficiary’s surviving the distribution date. If a beneficiary of a future interest under the terms of a trust fails to survive the distribution date, the following apply:

except as provided in (4) of this subsection, if the future interest is not in the form of a class gift and the deceased beneficiary leaves surviving descendants, a substitute gift is created in the beneficiary’s surviving descendants; the beneficiary’s surviving descendants take by representation the property to which the beneficiary would have been entitled had the beneficiary survived the distribution date;

except as provided in (4) of this subsection, if the future interest is in the form of a class gift, other than a future interest to “issue,” “descendants,” “heirs of the body,” “heirs,” “next of kin,” “relatives,” or “family,” or a class described by language of similar import, a substitute gift is created in the surviving descendants of a deceased beneficiary; the property to which the beneficiaries would have been entitled had all of them survived the distribution date passes to the surviving beneficiaries and the surviving descendants of the deceased beneficiaries; each surviving beneficiary takes the share to which the surviving beneficiary would have been entitled had the deceased beneficiaries survived the distribution date; each deceased beneficiary’s surviving descendants who are substituted for the deceased beneficiary take by representation the share to which the deceased beneficiary would have been entitled had the deceased beneficiary survived the distribution date; in this paragraph, “deceased beneficiary” means a class member who fails to survive the distribution date and leaves one or more surviving descendants;

for the purposes of AS

13.12.701

, words of survivorship attached to a future interest are not, in the absence of additional evidence, a sufficient indication of an intent contrary to the application of this section; words of survivorship include words of survivorship that relate to the distribution date or to an earlier or an unspecified time, whether those words of survivorship are expressed in condition-precedent, condition-subsequent, or another form;

if a governing instrument creates an alternative future interest with respect to a future interest for which a substitute gift is created by (1) or (2) of this subsection, the substitute gift is superseded by the alternative future interest only if an expressly designated beneficiary of the alternative future interest is entitled to take in possession or enjoyment.

If, under (a) of this section, substitute gifts are created and not superseded with respect to more than one future interest and the future interests are alternative future interests, one to the other, the property passes under the primary substitute gift, except that, if there is a younger-generation future interest, the property passes under the younger-generation substitute gift and not under the primary substitute gift. In this subsection,

“primary future interest” means the future interest that would have taken effect had all the deceased beneficiaries of the alternative future interests who left surviving descendants survived the distribution date;

“primary substitute gift” means the substitute gift created with respect to the primary future interest;

“younger-generation future interest” means a future interest that

is to a descendant of a beneficiary of the primary future interest;

is an alternative future interest with respect to the primary future interest;

is a future interest for which a substitute gift is created; and

would have taken effect had all the deceased beneficiaries who left surviving descendants survived the distribution date except the deceased beneficiary of the primary future interest;

“younger-generation substitute gift” means the substitute gift created with respect to the younger-generation future interest.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, if, after the application of (a) and (b) of this section, there is not a surviving taker, the property passes in the following order:

if the trust was created in a nonresiduary devise in the transferor’s will or in a codicil to the transferor’s will, the property passes under the residuary clause in the transferor’s will; for purposes of this section, the residuary clause is treated as creating a future interest under the terms of a trust;

if a taker is not produced by the application of (1) of this subsection, the property passes to the transferor’s heirs under AS

13.12.711

.

If, after the application of (a) and (b) of this section, there is not a surviving taker and if the future interest was created by the exercise of a power of appointment,

the property passes under the donor’s gift-in-default clause, if any, and the clause is treated as creating a future interest under the terms of a trust; and

if a taker is not produced by the application of (1) of this subsection, the property passes as provided in (c) of this section.

In (c) of this section, “transferor” means the donor if the power was a nongeneral power and means the donee if the power was a general power.

In this section,

“alternative future interest” means an expressly created future interest that can take effect in possession or enjoyment instead of another future interest on the happening of one or more events, including survival of an event or failure to survive an event, whether an event is expressed in condition-precedent, condition-subsequent, or other form; a residuary clause in a will does not create an alternative future interest with respect to a future interest created in a nonresiduary devise in the will, whether or not the will specifically provides that lapsed or failed devises are to pass under the residuary clause;

“beneficiary” means the beneficiary of a future interest and includes a class member if the future interest is in the form of a class gift;

“class member” includes an individual who fails to survive the distribution date but who would have taken under a future interest in the form of a class gift had the individual survived the distribution date;

“distribution date,” with respect to a future interest, means the time when the future interest is to take effect in possession or enjoyment; the distribution date does not need to occur at the beginning or end of a calendar day, but can occur at a time during the course of a day;

“future interest” includes an alternative future interest and a future interest in the form of a class gift;

“future interest under the terms of a trust” means a future interest that was created by a transfer creating a trust or to an existing trust or by an exercise of a power of appointment to an existing trust, directing the continuance of an existing trust, designating a beneficiary of an existing trust, or creating a trust;

“surviving beneficiary” or “surviving descendant” means a beneficiary or a descendant who neither predeceased the distribution date nor is considered to have predeceased the distribution date under AS

13.12.702

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.708.
Class gifts to “descendants,” “issue,” or “heirs of the body”; form of distribution if none specified.

If a class gift in favor of “descendants,” “issue,” or “heirs of the body” does not specify the manner in which the property is to be distributed among the class members, the property is distributed among the class members who are living when the interest is to take effect in possession or enjoyment, in such shares as they would receive, under the applicable law of intestate succession, if the designated ancestor had then died intestate owning the subject matter of the class gift.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.709.
Distribution by representation, per capita at each generation, and per stirpes.

If an applicable statute or a governing instrument calls for property to be distributed “by representation” or “per capita at each generation,” the property is divided into as many equal shares as there are

surviving descendants in the generation nearest to the designated ancestor that contains one or more surviving descendants; and

deceased descendants in the same generation who left surviving descendants, if any.

In (a) of this section, each surviving descendant in the nearest generation is allocated one share, and the remaining shares, if any, are combined and then divided in the same manner among the surviving descendants of the deceased descendants as if the surviving descendants who were allocated a share and their surviving descendants had predeceased the distribution date.

If a governing instrument calls for property to be distributed “per stirpes,” the property is divided into as many equal shares as there are

surviving children of the designated ancestor; and

deceased children who left surviving descendants.

In (c) of this section, each surviving child, if any, is allocated one share, and the share of each deceased child with surviving descendants is divided in the same manner, with subdivision repeating at each succeeding generation until the property is fully allocated among surviving descendants.

For the purposes of (a) — (d) of this section, an individual who is deceased and does not leave surviving descendants is disregarded, and an individual who leaves a surviving ancestor who is a descendant of the designated ancestor is not entitled to a share.

In this section,

“deceased child” or “deceased descendant” means a child or a descendant who either predeceased the distribution date or is considered to have predeceased the distribution date under AS

13.12.702

;

“distribution date,” with respect to an interest, means the time when the interest is to take effect in possession or enjoyment; the distribution date does not need to occur at the beginning or end of a calendar day, but can occur at a time during the course of a day;

“surviving ancestor,” “surviving child,” or “surviving descendant” means an ancestor, a child, or a descendant who neither predeceased the distribution date nor is considered to have predeceased the distribution date under AS

13.12.702

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.710.
Worthier-title doctrine abolished.

The doctrine of worthier title is abolished as a rule of law and as a rule of construction. Language in a governing instrument describing the beneficiaries of a disposition as the transferor’s “heirs,” “heirs at law,” “next of kin,” “distributees,” “relatives,” or “family,” or language of similar import, does not create or presumptively create a reversionary interest in the transferor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.711.
Interests in heirs and other persons.

If an applicable statute or a governing instrument calls for a present or future distribution to or creates a present or future interest in a designated individual’s “heirs,” “heirs at law,” “next of kin,” “relatives,” or “family,” or language of similar import, the property passes to those persons, including the state, and in such shares as would succeed to the designated individual’s intestate estate under the intestate succession law of the designated individual’s domicile if the designated individual died when the disposition is to take effect in possession or enjoyment. If the designated individual’s surviving spouse is living but is remarried at the time the disposition is to take effect in possession or enjoyment, the surviving spouse is not an heir of the designated individual.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.712.
Nonademption of specific transfers in trust.

Unless the trust provides otherwise, a beneficiary of a trust has a right to property that, by the terms of the trust, is to be specifically distributed to the beneficiary and to

any amount of a condemnation award that is for the taking of the property and that is unpaid when the distribution becomes effective;

any proceeds from fire or casualty insurance on, or other recovery for injury to, the property that are unpaid when the distribution becomes effective; and

property owned by the settlor when the distribution becomes effective if the property is acquired as a result of foreclosure, or obtained in lieu of foreclosure, of the security interest for the specifically distributed obligation.

Unless the covered trust provides otherwise, if property that is to be specifically distributed to a beneficiary of a covered trust is instead sold or mortgaged by a trustee of the covered trust, or if a condemnation award, insurance proceeds, or a recovery for injury to the property is paid to a trustee of the covered trust, the beneficiary has the right to a general pecuniary property distribution that is equal to the net sale price, the amount of the unpaid loan, the condemnation award, the insurance proceeds, or the recovery. In this subsection, “covered trust,” means a trust that was originally amendable or revocable by the settlor but that cannot be amended or revoked by the settlor because of the settlor’s incapacity.

The right of a beneficiary under (b) of this section is reduced by any right the beneficiary has under (a) of this section.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 36 SLA 2001.]

[Repealed, § 3 ch 36 SLA 2001.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 40 SLA 2000; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 36 SLA 2001)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 4, ch. 36, SLA 2001, this section, as amended by §§ 1 - 3, ch. 36, SLA 2001, “applies to a trust instrument, including a conveyance, that is executed on or after August 9, 2000, and to that extent is retroactive under AS

01.10.090

.”

Sec. 13.12.720.
Family-owned business deduction.

If an individual includes a provision in a will, trust document, or beneficiary designation that is designed to reduce federal estate tax liability to zero, or to the lowest possible amount payable, by describing a portion or amount measured by reference to the unified credit, applicable exclusion amount, or exemption equivalent under 26 U.S.C. 2010 (Internal Revenue Code), or to other credits or deductions under 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code), then unless specifically stated otherwise, the reference to the unified credit, applicable exclusion amount, exemption equivalent, other credit, or other deduction shall be considered to include a reference to the family-owned business deduction available and allowed under 26 U.S.C. 2057 (Internal Revenue Code).

Unless specifically stated otherwise, the reference in the will, trust document, or beneficiary designation to the unified credit, applicable exclusion amount, exemption equivalent, family-owned business deduction, other credit, or other deduction shall be considered to refer to the unified credit, applicable exclusion amount, exemption equivalent, family-owned business deduction, other credit, or other deduction as it exists at the time of death of the individual.

History.

(§ 2 ch 40 SLA 2000)

Editor’s notes. —

26 U.S.C. 2057, cited in (a) of this section, was repealed by P.L. 113-295.